Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
LIMITED LIABILITY PARTNERSHIP ACT--REPEALED

Note

Part heading on page 468 of the main volume is reproduced to
correct printing error.

§§425-151 to 180 REPEALED. L 2000, c
218, §8.

Note

L 2000, c 219, §§56 to 59 purports to amend §§425-164, 169,
171, and 172.

Part heading on page 468 of the main volume is reproduced to
correct printing error.

PART VI.
[MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS]

§425-191 REPEALED. L 2002, c 41, §29.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next